District of Columbia statutes.
1-629.03

Employee debts to District government.

(a)

Whenever an employee or former employee of the District is indebted to the government for other than an erroneous payment and the debt has either been acknowledged by the employee or reduced to judgment by a court, the Mayor may, after 30 days notice to the employee, collect the amount of the indebtedness as provided in this subchapter.

(b)

The Mayor shall identify all debts owed to the government by an employee or former employee that have not been acknowledged by the employee or reduced to a judgment by a court, and the names of the employees, the amount of the debt, and supporting documentation shall be forwarded to the Corporation Counsel for appropriate action.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2903
as added Sept. 13, 1986, D.C. Law 6-144, § 2(c), 33 DCR 4383

History

1981 Ed., § 1-630.3.

Prior Codifications